Massachusetts, session 194th, H2758.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Paragraph (h) of subsection (1) of section 4 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as 
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:- If 
a member in service of a retirement system, who is an employee of the commonwealth, 
purchases creditable service time pursuant to this section, the retirement board shall send 
notification to the appropriate human resources or personnel administrator for the agency, 
department, authority, commission, bureau, division or office of the commonwealth that the 
employee serves indicating the amount of creditable service time the employee purchased 
pursuant to this section. The member in service shall then receive credit for such service time for 
the purpose of determining the rate at which he or she earns vacation time as an employee of the 
commonwealth.